Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 65. Mississippi International Trade Institute

§ 57-65-1.
Establishment; functions and duties.

The Department of Economic Development may establish a Mississippi International Trade Institute, hereinafter referred to as the MITI.

It shall be the function and duties of the MITI to:

Gather, evaluate, interpret and publish international trade data on Mississippi’s foreign trade.

Represent the state in responding to, and assisting, foreign officials or business representatives and domestic representatives in undertaking appropriate foreign trade development.

Establish liaison with those federal and state agencies and organizations engaged in international trade to assure for Mississippi the best possible posture for expanding its international trade economy.

Serve as a clearinghouse for inquiries received from foreign business persons seeking information on product distribution, sales, trade agreements, manufacturing, licensing and similar matters.

Publish a directory of prominent businesses and organizations in Mississippi’s foreign trade, with a product guide.

Provide special assistance to Mississippi’s agricultural producers and firms engaged in the marketing of agricultural products produced in Mississippi to develop overseas markets.

Communicate with foreign, national, state and local agencies, and public and private persons, associations and corporations regarding international marketing of agricultural products produced in Mississippi.

In executing the duties assigned in this section, the MITI shall work closely with other state and local agencies having responsibility for economic development.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Economic Development shall establish such institute if personnel and funds are made available therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 435; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 87, eff from and after July 1, 1988.